Connecticut, session 2026, SB00027.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of ____ dollars be appropriated to the Department of
Public Health, from the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, for hospitals in rural areas of the state to operate labor and delivery
and intensive care units.